District of Columbia statutes.
Expired

2-1213.03

Establishment of Financial Assurance Fund.

Expired.

History

Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-236, § 4, 42 DCR 33

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2263.

Expiration of Law

Expiration of Law 10-236

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 2-1213.01.

Editor's Notes

Revision of subchapter: D.C. Law 12-26 revised this subchapter by renumbering former §§ 1-2271 through 1-2291 as §§ 1-2272 through 1-2292 [§§ 2-1215.02 through 2-1215.22, 2001 Ed.], and by adding § 1-2271 [§ 2-1215.01, 2001 Ed.].